California, session 20252026, AB2446.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 15006.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:15006.5. The Attorney General shall investigate any payout of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more received as a result of prediction market wagering if the event outcome was a matter of national security.SECTION 1.Section 100 of the Government Code is amended to read:100.(a)The sovereignty of the State of California resides in the people thereof, and all writs and processes shall issue in their name.(b)The style of all process shall be “The People of the State of California,” and all prosecutions shall be conducted in their name and by their authority.